Utah statutes.
72-3-202.   State park access highways -- Anasazi Indian Village State Park to Edge of the Cedars State Park.

State park access highways include:

(1)  ANASAZI INDIAN VILLAGE STATE PARK. Access to the Anasazi Indian Village State Park is at the park entrance located in Garfield County at milepoint 87.8 on State Highway 12. No access road is defined.

(2)  BEAR LAKE STATE PARK (Marina). Access to the Bear Lake Marina is at the pay gate located in Rich County at milepoint 413.2 on State Highway 89. No access road is defined.

(3)  BEAR LAKE STATE PARK (East Shore). Access to the Bear Lake East Shore begins in Rich County at State Highway 30 and proceeds northerly on a county road (L326) a distance of 9.2 miles, to the camping area of the park and is under the jurisdiction of Rich County.

(4)  BEAR LAKE STATE PARK (Rendezvous Beach). Access to the Bear Lake Rendezvous Beach is at the park entrance in Rich County at milepoint 124.5 on State Highway 30. No access road is defined.

(5)  CAMP FLOYD/STAGECOACH INN STATE PARK. Access to the Camp Floyd/Stagecoach Inn State Park is at the parking area in Utah County at milepoint 20.6 on State Highway 73. No access road is defined.

(6)  CORAL PINK SAND DUNES STATE PARK. Access to the Coral Pink Sand Dunes State Park begins in Kane County at State Highway 89 and proceeds southwesterly on a county road a distance of 12.0 miles to the visitor center of the park and is under the jurisdiction of Kane County.

(7)  DEAD HORSE POINT STATE PARK. Access to Dead Horse Point State Park begins in Grand County at State Highway 191 and proceeds southwesterly on State Highway 313 a distance of 20.8 miles to the camping area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(8)  DEER CREEK STATE PARK. Access to Deer Creek State Park begins in Wasatch County at State Highway 189 and proceeds southwesterly on State Highway 314 a distance of 0.2 miles to the boat ramp at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(9)  EAST CANYON STATE PARK. Access to East Canyon State Park begins in Morgan County at State Highway 66 and proceeds southeasterly on State Highway 306 a distance of 0.1 miles to the parking area at the park and is under the jurisdiction of UDOT.

(10)  EDGE OF THE CEDARS STATE PARK. Access to Edge of the Cedars State Park begins in Blanding at U.S. Highway 191 and proceeds west on Center Street to 600 West then north on 600 West to the parking area and museum at 660 West 400 North. The access road is under jurisdiction of Blanding.

